Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 12. Kinds of Insurance, Limits of Risk, and Reinsurance.
“reinsurance transaction” means a transaction stemming from a contract by which the assuming insurer agrees to indemnify the ceding insurer in whole or in part against liability or losses that the ceding insurer might incur under a separate contract of insurance with its insured.

required by the director;

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 20, 21 ch 50 SLA 1990; am § 22 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 19 — 22 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 17, 18 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 10 ch 81 SLA 1997; am §§ 13, 14 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 27 ch 23 SLA 2011; am §§ 1 —5, 19. ch 56 SLA 2018; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 11 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (i) was formerly
AS

21.12.120

. Renumbered as (g) in 1991 and as (i) in 1993, at which time former (h) and (i) were relettered as (g) and (h), respectively. In 1991, the introductory clause of (i)
was rewritten to reflect the reorganization and a manifest error in an internal reference in § 21,
ch. 50, SLA 1990, which enacted former AS

21.12.120

, was corrected.

Subsections (d) — (g) were enacted as (j) — (m); relettered in 2018, at which time subsection (i) was relettered as (h) [now (i)] and internal cross references in subsections (a) and (c) were conformed to the relettering.

In 2021, the paragraphs in subsection (i) were numbered to maintain alphabetical order.

Subsection (h) was enacted as (i). Relettered in 2021, at which time former subsection (h) was relettered as subsection (i).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 14, 2018, rewrote (a); in (b), in the introductory language, inserted “, or certified” following “accredited”, “under (a)(4) and (5)” following “credit permitted”, substituted “section is not allowed” for “section may not be allowed”, and made related changes, in (b)(1), substituted “a state” for “any state” following “competent jurisdiction in”, deleted “this provision is not intended to conflict with or override the obligation of the parties to a reinsurance agreement to arbitrate their disputes, if such an obligation is created in the reinsurance agreement;” near the end, in (b)(2), added “, nothing in this subsection is intended to conflict with or override the obligation of the parties to a reinsurance agreement to arbitrate their disputes if such an obligation is created in the reinsurance agreement” at the end; in (c), in the first sentence, substituted “An asset or a reduction” for “A reduction” at the beginning, inserted “by a domestic insurer” following “reinsurance ceded”, inserted “, (b), and (i) — (

l

)” [now “, (b), and (d) — (f)”] following “requirements of (a)”, added the second sentence, in (b)(2), inserted “, including those exempted from filing as defined by the purposes and procedures manual of the Securities Valuation Office, and those” following “Insurance Commissioners”, at the end of the introductory language in (b)(3), added “in this paragraph, “qualified United States financial institution” means an institution that”, added (b)(3)(A) — (C); repealed (d) — (h); in (i), added “unless otherwise indicated,” at the end of the introductory language, added (i)(1), and made related changes; added (j) — (m) [now (d) — (g)].

The 2021 amendment, in (a), in the introductory language, substituted “(1) – (7)” for “(1) – (6)” following “meets the requirements of”, added (a)(6) and made a related change, in (a)(7), substituted “(1) – (6)” for “(1) – (5)” following “meet the requirements of”; in (g), in the introductory language of (g)(2)(D), inserted “, meets the conditions set out in (a)(6) of this section,” following “certified in this state”; added (h)(3) [now (i)(2)]; added (i) [now (h)].

Administrative Code. —

For reinsurance, see 3 AAC 21, art. 6.

For fees, see 3 AAC 31, art. 1.

Editor’s notes. —

In sub-subparagraph (a)(5)(C)(iii), the reference to “the National Association of Insurance Commissioners financial standards and accreditation program” may refer to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners financial regulation standards and accreditation program.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 56, SLA 2018 (HB 401), which amended this section, see 2018 House Journal 2601.

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 11, SLA 2021 (SB 87), amending (a) and (i) of this section, and adding new subsection (h), see 2021 Senate Journal 290 — 291.

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 1809 to 1827.

46 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 2051 to 2068.